apertium-tat.err.twol
"Fronting of U"
%{U%}:ү <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;  ! бел>{U}:белү
                       [ :FrontVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;  ! сөйлә>{U}:сөйләү
            except
                       [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
                    [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! җыел>{U}>{s}{I}:җыелуы
                                      й: %>: _ ;
! кайт>{U}:кайту

"U > в between vowels"
%{U%}:в <=> [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
            except
                           й: %>: _ ;
! сөйлә>{U}>{s}{I}н:сөйләвен
! уйна>{U}>{s}{I}н:уйнавы

"U > ю after й"
%{U%}:ю <=> й: %>: _ ;
! сөй+у : сөю, куй+у : кую

"word-final у or ү becomes в when a vowel-initial suffix follows and a vowel precedes"
Vu:в <=> :Vow/:0 _ %>: [ :BeginVow | %{U%}: ]/[ :0 ] ;
         where Vu in ( у ү ) matched;
!у:в <=> _ :Vow/:0 ;
! яу, яварга, яву
! but not суы:свы !!

"Deletion of high vowels before {U}"
Vi:0 <=> _ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ;
     where Vi in ( е ы ) matched ;

! укы>{U}>{s}{I}{n}:укуы
! төзе>{U}>{s}{I}{n}:төзүе

!!!! й stuff !!!!

"Delete й in й>е and й>я and й>ю"
й:0 <=> _ %>: :AmbigVow/:0 ;
!        _ %>:/:0 :е ;
!        _ %>:/:0 :я ;
!        _ %>:/:0 :ю ;

"Convert {A} to я after й and {j}"
%{A%}:я <=> [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
            .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
        except
            _ ( %>: ) %{E%}: ;

"Convert {E} to я after й and {j}"
%{E%}:я <=> [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;


!!!! Special archiphonemes !!!!

"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
%{G%}:0 <=>  %{I%}: :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;

!!!!!!!! To be improved !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! allow analysis of "дусы", "асы" etc      !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"{д} surfaces before vowels"
! ал%{д%}+{D}{A}н     ал%{д%}+{I}
! ал-дан               алд-ы
%{д%}:д <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;

"{т} surfaces before vowels"
%{т%}:т <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
! ас%{т%}+{D}{A}н     ас%{т%}+{I}
! ас-тан              аст-ы

!"Soft sign deletion before suffix starting with a vowel" ! FIXME: J.N.W., please check this
! яшь>{I}м      яшь>{s}{I}{n}   but  табигать>{D}{A}н
! яш00-е-м      яш00-0--е--0-        табигать0-т--ә-н
!
! ь:0 <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;    ! They all lead to a rule conflict
! ь:0 <=> _ %>: :Vow ;              
!ь:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: ;            
!        _ %>: %{s%}: ;

"Soft sign deletion before suffix starting with a vowel"
ь:0 <=> _ %>: :Vow/[ :0 - %>: ] ;
